Hawaii statutes.
§171-50.2 Exchanges for conversion of
leasehold lands to fee simple ownership. The board may exchange public
lands for private lands to be condemned or involuntarily sold pursuant to
chapter 516. An exchange shall be requested by the executive director of the
Hawaii housing finance and development corporation and shall be effected in
conformity with section 171-50; provided that an exchange shall be subject to
legislative approval; provided further that the private lands conveyed to the
State shall be disposed of pursuant to chapter 516; and provided further that
lands exchanged need not be of like-kind or comparable use; provided further
that no lands classified as conservation shall be exchanged for private lands. [L
1975, c 184, pt of §3; am L 1987, c 337, §7(2); am L 1997, c 350, §14; am L
2005, c 196, §26(b); am L 2006, c 180, §16; am L 2014, c 146, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next